Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.050

Functions authorized.

A metropolitan municipal corporation shall have the power to perform any one or more of the following functions, when authorized in the manner provided in this chapter:

(1) Metropolitan water pollution abatement.

(2) Metropolitan water supply.

(3) Metropolitan public transportation.

(4) Metropolitan garbage disposal.

(5) Metropolitan parks and parkways.

(6) Metropolitan comprehensive planning.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 70 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.050. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 5.]